Tennessee, session 114, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-3-303, is amended by deleting
"three (3) business days" and substituting "five (5) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1062
003155
- 1 -